Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.200

Department of revenue as secretary of state's agent for legal entity renewals.

The secretary of state and the director of revenue may enter into agreements designating the department of revenue as the secretary of state's agent for issuing all or a portion of the legal entity renewals within the jurisdiction of the secretary of state.

[ 2011 c 298 s 24; 1982 c 182 s 12.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Business licensing service act: Chapter 19.02 RCW.

Certain business or professional activity licenses exempt: RCW 19.02.800.